Ohio, session 136, HB37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.443 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.443. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the portion of the road known as state route fifty-six, between state route three hundred sixteen and the Madison county line, in Pickaway county, shall be known as the "Detective Rex Emrick Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.